Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Presidential Preference
Primaries

118.550.
Definitions.
[Repealed.]

118.551.
Definition
of political party.

As used in KRS

118.561

to

118.651

,
“political party” means each political party whose candidates
received ten percent (10%) or more of the vote for Governor and Lieutenant
Governor in the preceding election, or has a registration equal to ten percent
(10%) or more of the total registered voters in the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 29, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 2, § 9, effective July 15, 1998.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Reform Party was not entitled to utilize a presidential
preference primary in the year 2000, regardless of whether it garnered more
than 10% of the vote for Governor and Lieutenant Governor in the 1999 general
election or had registration equal to ten (10) percent of the total registered
voters in Kentucky since it received less than 20% of the total votes cast
in the last presidential general election.

OAG 00-1

.

118.555.
Methods
by which to determine a political party’s delegate votes for presidential
candidates.

The state executive committee of each political party shall, pursuant to its party’s rules, determine whether to distribute its party’s authorized delegate votes for presidential candidates at its party’s national convention based on the results of a party caucus, a presidential preference primary, or a combination of the two (2) methods. Each state executive committee shall notify the State Board of Elections of its decision not later than the December 31 preceding the day for conducting a presidential preference primary as set by KRS

118.561

.

If a state executive committee determines that its party’s authorized delegate votes for presidential candidates at its party’s national convention shall be distributed based on the results of a party caucus, a presidential preference primary shall not be conducted for that political party, and the provisions of KRS

118.561

to

118.651

shall not apply. The distribution of delegates among the presidential candidates shall be determined by party rule.

If a state executive committee determines that its party’s authorized delegate votes for presidential candidates at its party’s national convention shall be distributed based on the results of both a party caucus and a presidential preference primary, the formula for distribution of authorized delegate votes based on the results of a party caucus shall be determined by party rule. The distribution of delegates based on the results of a presidential preference primary shall be in accordance with the provisions of KRS 118.641(1). Regardless of the method by which the authorized delegate votes are distributed, the casting of votes on the first ballot at each party’s national convention shall be in accordance with the provisions of KRS 118.641(2).

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 431, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 296, § 14, effective July 14, 1992.

118.560.
Presidential
preference primary elections. [Repealed.]

118.561.
Presidential
preference primary election.

Subject to KRS

118.555

, on the first Tuesday after the third Monday in May, in each presidential election year, the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall conduct presidential preference primary elections within each political party.

Hours of voting shall be in accordance with KRS

118.035

.

The cost of election, officials, and the entire method of conducting the presidential preference primary shall be in accordance with Kentucky statutory provisions on primary elections.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 29, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 431, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 2002, ch. 262, § 2, effective July 15, 2002.

118.570.
Voter
qualification. [Repealed.]

118.571.
Voter
qualification.

To qualify to vote in a presidential
preference primary in the Commonwealth a voter must register to vote in the
same manner as prescribed in KRS Chapter 116. A voter shall vote only in the
presidential preference primary of the political party for which he has declared
a preference as required by KRS

116.055

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 29, § 3, effective July 15, 1986.

118.580.
Nomination
of candidates by state board of elections. [Repealed.]

118.581.
Nomination of candidates by State Board of Elections.

The State Board of Elections shall convene in Frankfort on the third Tuesday in December preceding a presidential preference primary. At the meeting required by this section, the board shall nominate as presidential preference primary candidates all those candidates of the political parties for the office of President of the United States who have qualified for matching federal campaign funds. Immediately upon completion of this requirement, the board shall transmit a list of all the nominees selected to the Secretary of State and shall also release the list to the news media.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 29, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 470, § 20, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 52, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 431, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 296, § 15, effective July 14, 1992; 2019 ch. 187, § 6, effective November 6, 2019.

118.590.
Nomination
of candidate by petition. [Repealed.]

118.591.
Nomination of presidential preference primary candidate by petition — Qualification of candidate through filing
of notice of candidacy.

Any person seeking the endorsement by a political party for the office of President of the United States, or any group organized in this state on behalf of, and with the consent of, the person, may file with the Secretary of State certified petitions signed by five thousand (5,000) persons who, at the time they sign, are registered and qualified voters in the Commonwealth and are affiliated, by registration, with the same political party as the candidate for whom petitions are filed.

The petitions shall be filed by the petitioners with the Secretary of State no later than the first Friday following the first Monday in January preceding a presidential preference primary.

The petitions shall state:

The name of the candidate for nomination and the party of which the candidate is a member; and

The name and address of the chair of the group circulating such petition.

The Secretary of State shall determine the sufficiency of petitions filed with him or her and shall immediately communicate his or her determination to the chair of the group which has filed the petitions.

In lieu of the petition requirements of subsections (1) to (4) of this section, a candidate may qualify to appear on the presidential preference primary ballot of the candidate’s political party by filing with the Secretary of State, no later than the first Friday following the first Monday in January preceding a presidential preference primary, a notice of candidacy signed by the candidate and either of the following:

A certification by the Federal Election Commission that, by the filing deadline, the candidate has qualified for matching federal campaign funds; or

Evidence that, by the filing deadline, the candidate’s name is qualified to appear on the presidential preference primary ballot of the candidate’s political party in at least twenty (20) other states.

The Secretary of State shall determine the sufficiency of the documentation provided pursuant to subsection (5) of this section and shall immediately communicate his or her determination to the candidate or the candidates’s agent.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 29, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 470, § 21, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 53, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 431, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 296, § 16, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 3, § 1, effective January 29, 1996; 2019 ch. 187, § 7, effective November 6, 2019.

118.600.
Notification
of nominees by Secretary of State. [Repealed.]

118.601.
Notification
of nominees by Secretary of State — Order of names on ballot —
Certification of candidates.

The Secretary of State shall contact each person who has been nominated by petition, or who has been nominated pursuant to KRS 118.591(5) and (6), and notify him or her in writing by certified mail, with return receipt requested, that his or her name will appear as a candidate on the Kentucky presidential primary ballot of his or her party.

The order in which the names of candidates for a presidential preference primary are to be printed on the ballot shall be determined by lot at a public drawing in the office of the Secretary of State at 2 p.m., standard time, on the Thursday following the filing deadline for the presidential preference primary as established in KRS

118.591

.

Not later than the date set forth in KRS 118.215(1)(a) preceding the presidential preference primary, and after the order of the names has been determined as provided by subsection (2) of this section, the Secretary of State shall certify to each county clerk the name, place of residence, and party of each candidate, as specified in the notice of candidacy forms or petitions filed with the Secretary of State and shall designate the device with which the candidates of each party shall be printed, in the order in which they are to appear on the ballot, with precedence to be given to the party that polled the highest number of votes at the preceding election for presidential electors, followed by the political party which received the second highest number of votes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 29, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 470, § 22, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 54, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 431, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 296, § 17, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 3, § 2, effective January 29, 1996; 2008, ch. 79, § 14, effective July 15, 2008; 2019 ch. 187, § 8, effective November 6, 2019.

118.610.
Candidates
required to make deposit with Secretary of State. [Repealed.]

118.611.
Candidates
required to make deposit with Secretary of State — Refund — Escheat
to Commonwealth.

Before any candidate’s name
is placed upon the official ballot by the Secretary of State for a presidential
preference primary in the Commonwealth, the candidate shall remit to the Secretary
of State a filing fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000), which shall be nonrefundable
unless no presidential preference primary is held.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 29, § 7, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 55, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 431, § 7, effective July 13, 1990.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/13/90) This section was amended
by two 1990 Acts which do not appear to be in conflict and have been compiled
together.

118.620.
Secretary
of state to place candidates’ names on ballots — Provision for casting
“uncommitted” vote. [Repealed.]

118.621.
Secretary
of State to place candidates’ names on ballot — Provisions for casting
uncommitted vote.

The Secretary of State shall
place the names of all candidates who have been nominated by petition, or
who have been nominated pursuant to KRS 118.591(5) and (6), on the official
presidential preference primary ballot of their respective political parties.
The Secretary of State shall additionally place on the ballot of each political
party a ballot slot for voters to cast an “uncommitted” vote.
This vote shall be entitled to the same proportionate representation as a
candidate under KRS

118.641

, but delegates representing these voters shall
not be bound by the first ballot requirement of KRS

118.631

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 29, § 8, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 56, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 3, § 3, effective January 29, 1996.

118.630.
Certification
of results of preference primary. [Repealed.]

118.631.
Certification
of results of preference primary.

Upon completion of the official
canvass of the results of the primary by the State Board of Elections, the
Secretary of State shall certify to the state chairman of each political party
participating in the presidential preference primary the following:

The names of the candidates entitled to delegate votes under provisions of KRS

118.641

;

The total vote received by each;

A declaration that the results of the presidential preference primary, in accordance with the division of votes reflected by the official canvass, shall be the official vote cast by each political party at its national convention, on the first ballot only, and shall be designated by KRS

118.551

to

118.651

as an automatic vote, expressing the will of the people of the Commonwealth of Kentucky; and

After the vote on the first ballot by the political party at its national convention, as required by this section, all responsibility under KRS

118.551

to

118.651

shall terminate and further balloting shall be the prerogative of the political parties as might be prescribed by the rules of such political parties.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 29, § 9, effective July 15, 1986.

118.640.
Distribution
of authorized delegate vote among party candidates. [Repealed.]

118.641.
Distribution
of authorized delegate vote among party candidates.

The political parties in distributing authorized delegate votes among party candidates shall select one (1) of the following methods of distribution:

The candidates receiving the highest number of votes, provided each candidate receives at least fifteen percent (15%) of the total vote cast by his political party, shall be awarded a pro rata portion of the authorized delegate vote of his political party as follows:

The total vote received by the candidates qualifying under the provisions of KRS

118.551

to

118.651

and subsections herein shall, when combined, be equal to one hundred percent (100%);

Each such candidate shall share in the total percentage in direct proportion to the total vote received by him mathematically determined to be the percentage of the aggregate vote which represents one hundred percent (100%);

Each political party shall appropriate such percentage, as is determined by this section, to the total number of delegate votes as are allotted by the national committee of each party; or

The candidate receiving the highest number of votes cast by his political party shall be awarded a pro rata portion of the authorized delegate vote of his political party in compliance with the state party rules for that party.

Each political party shall, on the first ballot at its national convention, cast this Commonwealth’s vote for the candidates as determined by the primary or party caucus and calculated under this section or under party rules, whichever is applicable. Provided, however, that in the event of the death or withdrawal of a candidate receiving votes under this section prior to the tabulation of the first ballot, any delegate votes allocated to such candidate shall be considered uncommitted. Withdrawal shall mean notice in writing by the candidate to the chairman of the Kentucky delegation prior to the first ballot.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 29, § 10, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 431, § 8, effective July 13, 1990.

118.650.
Notice
to political party’s national committee. [Repealed.]

118.651.
Notice
to political party’s national committee.

It shall be the responsibility
of the state chairman of each political party to notify his party’s national
committee, no later than January 30 of each year in which such presidential
primary shall be conducted, of the provisions contained herein relating to
the automatic vote on the first ballot as required under KRS

118.551

to

118.641

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 29, § 11, effective July 15, 1986.